Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5891XS (6) 91 jm/jh S.F. 2252 Section 1. Section 15.491, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. âBusiness affiliateâ means an entity 3 that joins with or is an affiliate of a business and invests or 4 participates in the investment in a sports stadium. 5 NEW SUBSECTION . 24A. âSports stadiumâ means a facility, 6 stadium, arena, or other structure where national football 7 league games are held. 8 Sec. 2. Section 15.492, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 9 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 a. The businessâs proposed project must be located on a 11 site where the business has a controlling interest in , or 12 a certified site greater than two hundred fifty acres , or 13 a certified site where a sports stadium may be built . The 14 authority must determine a site is suitable for the project. 15 Sec. 3. Section 15.492, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 d. (1) (a) The business must be primarily engaged 18 in advanced manufacturing, biosciences, or research and 19 development , or must be a business specified in subparagraph 20 (2) . The business shall not be a data center business, 21 a retail business, or a business where a cover charge or 22 membership requirement restricts certain individuals from 23 entering the business. 24 (2) (b) Factors the authority shall consider to determine 25 if a business is primarily engaged in advanced manufacturing, 26 biosciences, or research and development shall include but are 27 not limited to all of the following: 28 (a) (i) The businessâs North American industry 29 classification system code. 30 (b) (ii) The businessâs main sources of revenue. 31 (c) (iii) The businessâs customer base. 32 (2) The business is comprised of one or more entities 33 building a sports stadium. For purposes of this subparagraph, 34 the term âbusinessâ includes a business affiliate. 35 -1- LSB 5891XS (6) 91 jm/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 2252